New Mexico, session 2026, HB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) is appropriated from the tribal infrastructure project fund to the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to pay a prior-year obligation due a contractor pursuant to notice of obligation number 3 on tribal infrastructure project 23TIF11 that was not paid to the legitimate contractor. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the tribal infrastructure project fund. .233328.1